Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Theft and Related Offenses.
Sec. 11.46.285.
Fraudulent use of an access device or identification document.

A person commits the crime of fraudulent use of an access device or identification document if, with intent to defraud, the person uses an access device or identification document to obtain property or services with knowledge that

the access device or identification document is stolen or forged;

the access device or identification document is expired or has been revoked or cancelled; or

for any other reason, that person’s use of the access device or identification document is unauthorized by either the issuer or the person to whom the access device or identification document is issued.

Fraudulent use of an access device or identification document is

a class B felony if the value of the property or services obtained is $25,000 or more;

a class C felony if the value of the property or services obtained is $75 or more but less than $25,000;

a class A misdemeanor if the value of the property or services obtained is less than $75.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 65 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 2005; am § 11 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 13 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 8 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 23 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For imprisonment for class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

.

For imprisonment for class C misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.125(e)

.

For imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 185(a)(8), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the first 2017 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 29,
ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the second 2017 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 75(a)(7), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (b)(1), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “obtained”; in (d)(2) and (3), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “obtained” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750.”

The first 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (b)(1), deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “property or services obtained”.

The second 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (b)(2) and (3), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), added “or identification document” in two places in the introductory paragraph, and in (1) and (2); in (b), added “or identification document” in the introductory paragraph, and substituted “services obtained is $75” for “services obtained, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

, is $750” in (2) and (3).

Editor's notes. —

Section 6, ch. 67, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of (b) of this section “applies to offenses occurring on or after July 14, 2005.”

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (b) as amended by sec. 11, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.290.
Obtaining an access device or identification document by fraudulent means.

A person commits the crime of obtaining an access device or identification document by fraudulent means if

the person buys an access device or identification document from a person other than the issuer or, as other than the issuer, the person sells an access device or identification document;

with intent to defraud, the person obtains an access device or identification document; or

with intent to defraud, the person makes a false statement in an application for an access device or identification document.

Obtaining an access device or identification document by fraudulent means is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 65 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 67 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent to defraud,” “obtain” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “credit card,” “property,” “services” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Original Code Provision - AS 11.22.

TD: V, 53-56.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 67, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of (b) of this section “applies to offenses occurring on or after July 14, 2005.”

Sec. 11.46.295.
Prior convictions.

For purposes of considering prior convictions in prosecuting a crime of theft under AS

11.46.130(a)(6)

or

11.46.140(a)(4)

or in prosecuting the crime of concealment of merchandise under AS

11.46.220(c)

,

a conviction for an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements is a conviction of an offense having elements similar to those of an offense defined as such under Alaska law at the time the offense was committed;

a conviction for an offense under Alaska law where the value of the property or services for the offense was lower than the value of property or services for the offense under current Alaska law is a prior conviction for that offense; and

the court shall consider the date of a prior conviction as occurring on the date that sentence is imposed for the prior offense.

History.

(§ 5 ch 133 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 49 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 131 SLA 1992; am § 13 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 12 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 14 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 24 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to this section, see sec. 185(a)(9), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language, deleted “or 11.46.140(a)(3),”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, inserted “or 11.46.140(a)(4)” in the introductory paragraph.

Editor's notes. —

Section 43(b), ch. 75, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendment of this section “[applies] to an offense occurring and before, on, or after July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares § 13, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, this section as amended by sec. 12, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”